New York, session 2025-2026, A1644.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 any department or agency of the state or of the city of New York which 3 provides financial assistance of any kind to owners of privately owned 4 residential housing within the city of New York shall suspend payment of 5 assistance to any such owners who are listed on the New York city 6 department of housing preservation and development's official major 7 problem owner list until all class C violations are removed by the New 8 York department of housing preservation and development. Additionally, 9 during such period when assistance is suspended, owners who have not 10 corrected the class C violations and been removed from the problem owner 11 list for such violations shall not evict any tenant for nonpayment of 12 rent or for violation of lease agreements that related in any way to the 13 class C violations which are the subject of suspension of assistance. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04465-01-5